Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
In General

§ 39-5-1.
Department of archives and history created; objects and purposes.

There shall be for the State of Mississippi a department of archives and history located in the state capitol in apartments set aside for its use by the governor. The objects and purposes of the department are the care and custody of official archives, the collecting of materials bearing upon the history of the state and of the territory included therein, from the earliest times, the editing of official records and other historical material, the diffusion of knowledge in reference to the history and resources of this state, the preparation and publication of annual reports, the encouragement of historical work and research and the performance of such other acts and requirements as may be enjoined by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1633; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3447; 1930, § 3626; 1942, § 6180.

§ 39-5-3.
Department board of trustees generally.

The department of archives and history shall be under the control of a board of nine trustees. The board shall have the power and authority to fill all vacancies occurring therein, whether by expiration of term of service or by death or resignation, but the names of all newly elected members shall be communicated to the next ensuing session of the state senate for confirmation, and in case it shall reject any of the said newly elected trustees it shall proceed forthwith to fill the vacancy or vacancies by an election. All trustees chosen to succeed the present members or their successors shall serve for a term of six years. The board of trustees shall hold at the state capitol at least one regular meeting during the year, and as many special meetings as may be necessary, and at said meetings five members shall constitute a quorum. The director of the department of archives and history, hereinafter provided, shall be secretary of the board. The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services other than the amount of their necessary expenses actually paid out while in attendance on the meetings of the board or the business of the department. The board is empowered to adopt rules for its own government and for the government of the department, to elect and fix the compensation of a director not to exceed the maximum set by the legislature, and other officials or employees, and to do and perform such other acts and things as may be necessary to carry out the true intent and purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1634; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3448; 1930, § 3627; 1942, § 6181; Laws, 1960, ch. 237; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 39-5-5.
General powers and duties of board of trustees.

The duties and powers of the Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History shall include, in addition to other duties and powers granted or prescribed by law, the following:

To determine the location of places of historical interest within the state;

To make a survey of buildings of all types throughout the state which are in danger of destruction, without proper care, and which in the opinion of the board of trustees should be preserved for historical purposes;

To contact the proper authorities of the United States national cemeteries and military parks to determine whether or not the record of Mississippi troops is adequately commemorated;

To acquire, preserve, restore or operate any real or personal property deemed significant for historical, architectural, archaeological or cultural reasons, to expend funds for such purposes, to enter into contracts or agreements with any agency of the United States or any person, firm, corporation or association for such purposes and to do any and all things which may be necessary or desirable to carry out such purposes;

To participate with any agency of the United States, any other governmental agency or any person, firm, corporation, association or group in mutual or cooperative programs or projects within the duties and powers of the board of trustees;

To accept grants or donations of money or property, real or personal, from any agency of the United States, any other governmental agency or any person, firm, corporation, association or group. However, the board of trustees shall not be required, except by specific act of the Legislature, to accept any property without its consent; and

To provide suitable markers with adequate descriptions of the historical sites to which they refer, for places of historical interest and to provide suitable markers on the highways and roads of this state showing the direction and distance to the historical sites.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6181.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 501, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 13; Laws, 1990, ch. 502, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 39-5-6.
Powers and duties of board of trustees with respect to governor’s mansion; employment of and powers and duties of curator of New Capitol Building.

The duties and powers of the Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History shall include, in addition to other duties and powers granted or prescribed by law, the following:

To promulgate rules and regulations governing the use of the historic portion of the Governor’s Mansion;

To promulgate rules and regulations governing the acquisition of furniture and furnishings, including, but not limited to, carpets, rugs, paintings, draperies and objects of art, for the original or historic portion of the Governor’s Mansion;

To employ a curator of the mansion who shall have the following duties:

To maintain a descriptive inventory of and be responsible for the care and custody of all furniture and furnishings in the Governor’s Mansion that have been catalogued by the Department of Archives and History, including flat silver and silver hollowware. However, the Department of Finance and Administration shall maintain a descriptive inventory of and be responsible for the care and custody of all publicly owned furniture and furnishings in the Governor’s Mansion that have not been catalogued by the Department of Archives and History, including flat silver and silver hollowware; and

To conduct an educational training program for staff and volunteer guides who may conduct tours of the mansion when it is open to the public at specified times agreed upon by the Governor;

To promote the donation or loaning of money or property, real or personal, from any agency of the United States, state or local government, any person, firm, corporation, association or group, for the purpose of furnishing or decorating the original or historic portion of the Governor’s Mansion;

To accept such donations of money or property, real or personal, from any agency of the United States, state or local government, any person, firm, corporation, association or group, for the purpose of furnishing or decorating the original or historic portion of the Governor’s Mansion, provided that the board of trustees shall not be required to accept any donation of furniture or furnishings without its consent;

To sell, donate or otherwise dispose of unused surplus property of the Governor’s Mansion, excluding any property located in the mansion which belongs to the Governor’s Office, and to deposit the proceeds of such sales in the Governor’s Mansion Fund of the Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History for use, in the board’s discretion, in acquiring furniture or furnishings, including, but not limited to, carpets, rugs, paintings, draperies and objects of art, for the original or historic portion of the Governor’s Mansion; and

To review and approve any major changes in the architecture, furniture, furnishings, decoration or landscaping of the grounds of the Governor’s Mansion.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 337; Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 14 1980, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 487, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012; Laws, 2019, ch. 335, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 39-5-7.
Director of department.

The department of archives and history shall be under the immediate management and control of a director, to be elected by the board of trustees, whose term of office shall be six years, and until his successor is elected and qualified. He shall take an oath of office as do other state officials, and shall be commissioned in like manner. He shall have authority to adopt a seal for use in official business. He shall devote his time to the work of the department, using his best endeavor to develop and build it up, so as to carry out the design of its creation. He shall have the control and direction of the work and operations of the department, and shall preserve its collection, care for the official archives that may come into his custody, collect, as far as possible, all materials bearing upon the history of the state and the territory included therein from the earliest times, prepare the official registers hereinafter provided, and diffuse knowledge in reference to the history and resources of the state. The director of the department shall make a report of the expenses of the department to the legislature of the state as state officers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1635; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3449; 1930, § 3628; 1942, § 6182.

§ 39-5-9.
Local Government Records Office.

A Local Government Records Office is established within the Department of Archives and History. The office shall begin operation when sufficient funds therefor have accumulated in the Local Government Records Management Fund established in Section 25-60-5. The office shall have the following powers and duties as well as any others which are prescribed by law elsewhere or assigned to the office by the director of the department:

Provide and coordinate education and training for counties and municipalities on records management issues.

Establish records management standards to guide counties and municipalities, such standards to include, but not be limited to, guidelines for microfilm production and storage, electronic records security and migration, records preservation, imaging and records storage.

Prepare records control schedules for adoption or amendment by the Local Government Records Committee established in Section 25-60-1. In the preparation of the schedules and amendments thereto, the office shall seek input from interested citizens and organizations.

Establish standards for records storage areas of local governmental bodies, such standards to include, but not be limited to, guidelines for the selection of an off-site storage facility for records of enduring or archival value.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 537, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 452, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 495, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 39-5-11.
Surrender of official books, records, etc., to department.

Any state, county, municipal or other official is hereby authorized and empowered, in his discretion, to turn over to the department for permanent preservation therein, any official books, records, documents, original papers, newspaper files and printed books not in current use in their offices. When so surrendered copies therefrom shall be made and certified by the director upon the application of any person interested, which certification shall have all the force and effect as if made by the officer originally in the custody of them, and for which the same fees shall be charged, to be collected in advance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1636; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3450; 1930, § 3629; 1942, § 6183.

§ 39-5-13.
Surrender of historical portraits to department.

The county boards of supervisors are hereby authorized and empowered to turn over to the department historical portraits which may be the property of the counties, and to make appropriations, on application of the director, for the purpose of placing oil portraits of distinguished citizens of Mississippi in the state’s hall of fame. The selection of such portraits shall be made at the request and under the direction of the board of trustees of the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1637; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3451; 1930, § 3630; 1942, § 6184.

§ 39-5-15.
Official and statistical register.

An official and statistical register of the State of Mississippi shall be compiled by the Secretary of State after each general election, to contain brief sketches of the several state officials, the members of Congress from Mississippi, the Supreme Court judges, the members of the Senate and House of Representatives of the State of Mississippi; a roster of all state and county officials, lists of all state institutions, with officials; state and county population and election statistics, and miscellaneous statistics. This register shall be published in an amount not to exceed forty thousand (40,000) and shall be for free distribution, the printing and the binding to be paid for as is other public printing and binding. Its distribution shall be paid out of the fund provided for the distribution of other public documents. This register shall have printed on the title page the following statement: “This book was paid for by the taxpayers of the State of Mississippi and authorized by the Mississippi Legislature.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1638; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3452; 1930, § 3631; 1942, § 6185; Laws, 1948, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 1964, ch. 380; Laws, 2001, ch. 501, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 39-5-17.
Acquisition of historic or prehistoric ruins, etc.

The board of supervisors of any county in the state, in its discretion, shall be authorized to acquire title by gift or grant the site of any historic or prehistoric ruin or monument or any object of historical, archeological or scientific value situated in said county, for public parks and reservations to be devoted solely to the educational and recreational advantages of the people, upon the written permission of the director of the department of archives and history of the State of Mississippi. Said board shall be authorized to expend in the maintenance of said public parks and reservations an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00) per annum out of the general funds of said county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6191; Laws, 1938, ch. 309.

§ 39-5-19.
Restoration and maintenance of abandoned cemeteries.

Upon the official certificate of the trustees of the state department of archives and history that any abandoned cemetery is of historical significance and should be repaired, rehabilitated, or maintained as a historical monument, the boards of supervisors of the respective counties in this state are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to repair, rehabilitate, and maintain any such cemetery within the borders of the county over which such board has jurisdiction.

Subject to like certificate from the said trustees, the board of supervisors in adjoining counties may, in their discretion, jointly accomplish such repairs, rehabilitation, or maintenance in those instances where the cemetery in question occupies territory which at one time or another was located as a part of said adjoining counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3019.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 425, §§ 1 and 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1971).

§ 39-5-21.
Unauthorized removal of property from governor’s mansion.

It shall be unlawful for any person to remove any personal property of the state in the custody of the curator of the governor’s mansion from the grounds of the governor’s mansion without the authorization of such curator. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished, upon conviction, by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year or by both such fine and imprisonment.

The provisions of this section are supplemental to other criminal statutes. An acquittal or conviction obtained under this section shall not be a bar to civil proceedings or actions arising from the same incident.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 349, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1980).

§ 39-5-23.
Historic Properties Trust Fund.

The Mississippi Department of Archives and History is hereby authorized and empowered to solicit and accept donations, bequests, devises, gifts and grants of money from individuals, organizations and federal, state and local governmental bodies, to be deposited in the Historic Properties Trust Fund which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Contributions to the Historic Properties Trust Fund may be undesignated or earmarked for the purpose of acquiring, preserving, restoring, supporting, operating and administering Mississippi Landmark properties or for use on specific historical projects that have been authorized by the Department of Archives and History. The Mississippi Department of Archives and History may deposit federal funds received under Section 2 of Laws, 2000, Chapter 487, as amended by Laws, 2003, Chapter 509, into the Historic Properties Trust Fund and may use such funds for the purposes provided in subsection (2) of Section 2 of Laws, 2000, Chapter 487, as amended by Laws, 2003, Chapter 509. The State Treasurer shall invest all monies in the Historic Properties Trust Fund as other state funds are authorized to be invested, and any interest earned shall be deposited into the fund.

The Mississippi Department of Archives and History is hereby authorized and empowered to solicit and accept donations, bequests, devises, gifts and grants of money and real and personal property. The Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History may, in its discretion, sell such real and personal property by public or private sale and shall deposit proceeds derived from such sale into the Historic Properties Trust Fund.

The Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History is authorized to establish the Mississippi Landmark Grant Program within the Historic Properties Trust Fund to help ensure the preservation of Mississippi Landmark properties.

The Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History may deposit funds appropriated by the Legislature, or funds transferred from the Historic Properties Financing Fund as specified in Section 89-12-37(2), into the account established for the Mississippi Landmark Grant Program within the Historic Properties Trust Fund. That portion of the proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 1 through 16 of Laws, 2002, Chapter 543, shall be deposited, in the manner provided in Sections 1 through 16 of Laws, 2002, Chapter 543, into the account established for the Mississippi Landmark Grant Program within the Historic Properties Trust Fund. All funds deposited in the account for the Mississippi Landmark Grant Program shall be used exclusively for the purpose of acquiring, preserving, restoring, supporting, operating and administering Mississippi Landmark properties or those properties to be designated as Mississippi Landmarks.

The board of supervisors of every county and the governing authorities of every municipality in the state may make contributions to the Mississippi Department of Archives and History, to be deposited into the account for the Mississippi Landmark Grant Program. Such contributions may be undesignated or earmarked for use on specific Mississippi Landmark properties.

The Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the Mississippi Landmark Grant Program, and the board of trustees shall promulgate all rules and regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of the program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 374, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 487, § 19; Laws, 2002, ch. 543, § 18; Laws, 2003, ch. 509, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2003.).

§ 39-5-24.
Mississippi History Trust Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Mississippi History Trust Fund.” The Mississippi Department of Archives and History may solicit and accept donations, bequests, devises, gifts and grants of money from individuals, organizations, and corporations to be deposited in the Mississippi History Trust Fund. All funds deposited in the Mississippi History Trust Fund shall be expended upon appropriation by the Legislature, solely for the purpose of collecting, preserving, protecting, researching and interpreting the State of Mississippi’s historic resources and for promoting the appreciation of those resources.

The Mississippi Department of Archives and History, with the advice of the Office of the State Treasurer, is authorized to establish a comprehensive investment plan for the purposes of the Mississippi History Trust Fund and to invest any funds in the trust fund in any instrument, obligation, security or property that constitutes legal investments and holdings. The comprehensive investment plan shall specify the investment policies to be used by the department in its administration of the funds in the trust fund. The department may authorize investments in any investment vehicle authorized for the Mississippi Prepaid Affordable College Tuition (MPACT) Program under Section 37-155-9. However, the restrictions in Section 37-155-9 as to percentages of the total fund that may be invested in any category of authorized investment shall not apply to the Mississippi History Trust Fund. The funds in the trust fund also may be invested in obligations of the state or any political subdivision of the state.

Notwithstanding any state law to the contrary, the department shall invest or cause to be invested the funds in the trust fund in a manner reasonable and appropriate to achieve the objectives of the trust fund, exercising the discretion and care of a prudent investor in similar circumstances with similar objectives. The department shall give due consideration to the risk, expected rate of return, term or maturity, diversification of total investments, liquidity and anticipated investments in and withdrawals from the trust fund. The department shall acquire all investments at prices not exceeding the prevailing market values for those securities.

Any limitations set forth in this section shall be applicable only at the time of purchase and shall not require the liquidation of any investment at any time. All investments shall be marked clearly to indicate ownership by the trust fund and, to the extent possible, shall be registered in the name of the trust fund.

Subject to the terms, conditions, limitations and restrictions set forth in this section, the department may sell, assign, transfer and dispose of any of the securities and investments of the trust fund if the sale, assignment or transfer has the approval of a majority of the entire Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History. The department may employ or contract with investment managers, evaluation services, or other such services as determined by the department to be necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the trust fund.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no trustee or employee of the department may have any direct or indirect interest in the income, gains or profits of any investments made by the department. No trustee or employee of the department may become an endorser or surety or in any manner an obligor for money loaned by or borrowed from the trust fund.

The department, with the advice of the Office of the State Treasurer, may establish criteria for investment managers, mutual funds or other such entities to act as contractors or consultants to the department. The department may contract, either directly or through those contractors or consultants, to provide such services as may be a part of the comprehensive investment plan or as may be deemed necessary or proper by the department, including, but not limited to, providing consolidated billing, individual and collective record keeping and accounting, and asset purchase, control and safekeeping.

Unexpended amounts remaining in the trust fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings on the unexpended amounts in the trust fund shall be deposited to the credit of the trust fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 468, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 39-5-25.
Construction of parking areas at official state historical markers.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation, in cooperation with the Mississippi Department of Archives and History, may develop a priority plan for the design and construction of motor vehicle parking areas located at official state historical markers on and along the rights-of-way of the highways, roads and streets under the jurisdiction of the Transportation Department. For the purposes of this section an “official state historical marker” means any such marker that is included on the inventory of state historical markers maintained by the Department of Archives and History.

The plan developed by the Transportation Department shall include provisions for road signs on and along the highway, road or street upon which a historical marker is located so as to provide advance notice to motorists approaching from either direction that a historical marker is located ahead. Such road signs shall be designed by the Mississippi Department of Transportation and shall be uniform in color, size and appearance.

The Executive Director of the Department of Transportation and the Executive Director of the Department of Archives and History shall meet annually to review the progress of the implementation of this section and to determine those projects that will be performed under this section during the next fiscal year.

The costs incurred by the Department of Transportation and the Department of Archives and History under the provisions of this section shall be paid out of any funds made available upon legislative appropriation; however, the Department of Transportation shall apply for such federal funds as may be available to help defray the costs of projects performed under this section. The Department of Archives and History shall include in its annual budget requests a request for funds for the systematic maintenance of official state historical markers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1994).

§ 39-5-27.
Archives Trust Fund.

The Mississippi Department of Archives and History is hereby authorized and empowered to solicit and accept donations, bequests, devises, gifts and grants of money from individuals and organizations, to be deposited in the Archives Trust Fund which is hereby created in the State Treasury. The State Treasurer shall invest all monies in the Archives Trust Fund as other state funds are authorized to be invested, and any interest earned shall be deposited into the fund. All funds deposited in the Archives Trust Fund shall be used, pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature, exclusively for the purpose of acquiring, cataloging, conserving and making available archival resources.

The Mississippi Department of Archives and History is hereby authorized and empowered to solicit and accept donations, bequests, devises, gifts and grants of real and personal property. The Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History may, in its discretion, sell such property by public or private sale and shall deposit proceeds derived from such sale into the Archives Trust Fund.

The Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to deposit into the Archives Trust Fund any monies in the Department’s Archives and Library Gift Fund and any monies received as a result of royalty or use fee payments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 380, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1996).

§ 39-5-29.
Museum Trust Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Museum Trust Fund.” The Mississippi Department of Archives and History may solicit and accept donations, bequests, devises, gifts and grants of money from individuals, organizations, and corporations to be deposited in the Museum Trust Fund. The State Treasurer shall invest all monies in the Museum Trust Fund as other state funds are authorized to be invested, and any interest earned shall be deposited into the fund. All funds deposited in the Museum Trust Fund shall be expended upon appropriation by the Legislature, solely for the purpose of acquiring, cataloging, conserving, and exhibiting artifacts.

The Mississippi Department of Archives and History may solicit and accept donations, bequests, devises, gifts and grants of real and personal property. The Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History, in its discretion, may sell the property by public or private sale and shall deposit proceeds derived from the sale into the Museum Trust Fund.

The Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History, in its discretion, may deposit into the Museum Trust Fund any monies in the Department’s Museum Gift Fund and any monies received as a result of royalty or use fee payments.

Unexpended amounts remaining in the special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on the unexpended amounts in the special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 39-5-31.
William F. Winter Archives and History Building.

The new Archives and History Building to be located on the corner of Amite Street and North Street in Jackson, Mississippi, shall be named the William F. Winter Archives and History Building.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 311, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 29, 2000.).

§ 39-5-33.
Authorization to extinguish, abandon and nullify certain conservation easements.

The Department of Archives and History is hereby authorized to extinguish, abandon and nullify any conservation easement granted to it by The Friends of the Siege and Battle of Corinth, Inc., its successors and similar organizations, whenever the department determines, in its discretion, that such action would be necessary or convenient for the use or ownership of such lands by the United States National Park Service.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 507, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 26, 2011.).